07_Project/apertium.fub.fub.lexd
LEXICON Noun_ɓe
Amerikaajo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:Amerikaʼen # Americans
baabiraawo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:baabiraaɓe # fathers
biɗɗo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:ɓiɓɓe 
bandiraawo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:bandiraaɓe # blood relatives
daadiraawo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:daadiraaɓe # mothers
debbo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:rewɓe
dewerɗiraawo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:dewerɗiraaɓe # siblings, brothers, sisters
ɗumeejo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:ɗumeʼen # what nationalities
ɗumeejo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:ɓeyeʼen # what nationalities
esiraawo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:esiraaɓe # in-laws
goɗɗo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:goɗɓe # some people
gorko<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:gorɓe # men, husbands
Hawsaajo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:Hawsaʼen # Hausa people
himɓe<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:himɓe
jawmu<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:jawmuʼen # owners, masters
koɗo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:hoɓɓe 
laamiiɗo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:laamiiɓe # kings, emirs
maamiraawo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:maamiraaɓe # grandparents, grandfathers, grandmothers
mallumjo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:mallumʼen # teachers
mawɗo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:mawɓe # some big ones, adults
mawniraawo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:mawniraaɓe # older siblings
minyiraawo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:minyiraaɓe # younger siblings
modibbo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:modiɓɓe
moyjo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:moyʼen # what types of person
nawliraawo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:nawliraaɓe # co-wives
nayeejo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:nayeʼen # old men
ndottiijo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:ndottiʼen # respected men
neɗɗo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:yimɓe
pukaraajo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:fukaraaɓe # students
Pullo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:Fulɓe # Fulanis
soobaajo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:soobaaʼen # friends
taaniraawo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:taaniraaɓe # grandchildren
tiniiɗo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:tiniiɓe # zealous people
Tuurankeejo<n><pl><cl_ɓe>:Tuurankoʼen

LEXICON Noun_ɗe
asaweere<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:asaweeje
booɗɗe<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:booɗɗe
ɓokki<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:ɓoɗɗe
ceede<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:ceede
daago<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:daage
dammugal<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:dammuɗe
danki<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:dangɗe
deftere<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:defte
fayande<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:payanɗe
fijirde<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:pijirɗe
geene<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:geene
gertogal<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:gertooɗe
gooro<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:goorooje
haɓɓere<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:kaɓɓe
hitaande<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:kitaale
huɓɓirde<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:kuɓɓirɗe
huunde<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:kuuje
innde<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:innɗe
jangirde<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:jangirɗe
jaawngal<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:jaawle
jemma<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:jemmaare
jigaawal<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:jigaaje
jokkere<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:jokke
jullirde<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:jullirɗe
jungo<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:juuɗe
kare<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:kare
kiikiɗe<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:kiikiiɗeere
kine<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:kine
kobo<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:kobooje
koombowal<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:koombooje
kondong<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:kondongje
koroowal<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:koromje
kosngal<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:kosɗe
kuugal<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:kuuɗe
leeso<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:leese
leggal<n><pl<cl_>:leɗɗe
loonde<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:looɗe
luumo<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:luuɓe
maayo<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:maaje
mangoro<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:mangorooje
ngesa<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:gese
njamndi<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:jamɗe
saare<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:ciʼe
suley<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:suleeje
tingyeere<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:tingyeeje
tumaatir<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:tumaatirji
tummude<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:tummuɗe
waalde<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:balɗe
wuro<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:gure
yiitere<n><pl><cl_ɗe>:giite

LEXICON Noun_ɗi
agoogo<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:agoogooji
akootiru<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:akootiji
aji<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:ajiji
baskur<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:baskurji
bindirgol<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:bindirɗi
bukkaaru<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:bukkaaji
buulol<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:buuli
ɓandu<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:ɓalli
ɓoosaaru<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:ɓoosaaji
canji<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:canji
dawrawol<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:dawraaji
ɗereewol<n><pl<cl_ɗi>:ɗereeji
gurel<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:gurelji
habaru<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:habaruuji
haala<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:haalaaji
jiiba<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:jiibaaji
kanti<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:kantiji
koloba<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:kolobaaji
kusel<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:kuselji
laawol<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:laabi
lewru<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:lebbi
liingu<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:liɗɗi
loosol<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:loosi
mbaala<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:baali
mbeɗu<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:beɗi
mbeewa<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:beeʼi
mbulku<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:bulki
minti<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:mintiiji
moota<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:mootaaji
nagge<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:naʼi
ndabbawa<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:dabbaaji
ngabbu<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:gabbi
ngapaleewol<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:ngapaleeji
ngeccawol<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:ngeccaaji
ngewta<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:ngewtaaji
nofuru<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:noppi
pataakewol<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:pataakeeji
pellel<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:pellelji
piiroowal<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:piirooji
puccu<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:pucci
reeta<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:reetaaji
sondu<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:colli
soorowol<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:soorooji
suudu<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:cuuɗi
taaga<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:taagaaji
taalol<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:taali
tebur<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:teburji
yiite<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:yiiteeji
ƴamol<n><pl><cl_ɗi>:ƴami

LEXICON Noun_koy
baalel<n><pl><cl_koy>:mbaaloy
ɓingel<n><pl><cl_koy>:ɓikkoy

LEXICON ClasslessNoun
Aaʼi<np><ant>:Aaʼi
Abdullaahi<np><ant>:Abdullaahi
Adamaawa<n><sg><np>:Adamaawa
Alarba<n><sg>:Alarba
Alat<n><sg>:Alat
Alhamiisa<n><sg>:Alhamiisa
Alim<n><ant>:Alim
Alkurʼaana<n><sg>:Alkurʼaana
Allah<n><sg><np>:Allah
Altine<n><sg>:Altine
Asawe<n><sg>:Asawe
Astawaaɓi<n><ant>:Astawaaɓi
Awdu<n><ant>:Awdu
Buuba<n><ant>:Buuba
Fulfulde<n>:Fulfulde
Hande<n><ant>:Hande
Jumɓaare<n><sg>:Jumɓaare
Saalihu<np><ant>:Saalihu
Salaasa<n><sg>:Salaasa
Sutura<np><ant>:Sutura
Usumaanu<n><ant>:Usumaanu
Yaakubu<np><ant>:Yaakubu
Zeynabu<np><ant>:Zeynabu

LEXICON Pronoun
mi<prn><p1><sg><subj>:mi
yam<prn><p1><sg><obj>:yam
am<prn><p1><sg><obj>:am
a<prn><p2><sg><subj>:a
ma<prn><p2><sg><obj>:ma
maa<prn><p2><sg><obj>:maa
o<prn><p3><sg><subj><mf>:o
ɗum<prn><p3><subj><mfn>:ɗum
mo<prn><p3><sg><obj><mf>:mo
min<prn><p1><pl><excl><subj><obj>:min
en<prn><p1><pl><incl><subj><obj>:en
on<prn><p2><pl><subj><obj>:on
ɓe<prn><p3><pl><subj><obj><mf>:ɓe
am<prn><pos><p1><sg><px1sg>:am
maa<prn><pos><p2><sg>:maa
maaɗa<prn><pos><p2><sg>:maaɗa
maako<prn><pos><p3><sg><mf>:maako
amin<prn><pos><p1><pl><excl>:amin
meeɗen<prn><pos><p1><pl><incl>:meeɗen
men<prn><pos><p1><pl><incl>:men
mooɗon<prn><pos><p2><pl>:mooɗon
mon<prn><pos><p2><pl>:mon
maɓɓe<prn><pos><p3><pl><mf>:maɓɓe
min<prn><p1><sg><emph>:min
an<prn><p2><sg><emph>:an
kanko<prn><p3><sg><mf><emph>:kanko
minin<prn><p1><pl><excl><emph>:minin
enen<prn><p1><pl><incl><emph>:enen
onon<prn><p2><pl><emph>:onon
kamɓe<prn><p3><pl><emph>:kamɓe
ɗam<prn><p3><sg><cl_ɗam>:ɗam
ɗam<prn><pos><p3><sg><cl_ɗam>:maajam
ɗam<prn><p3><sg><emph><cl_ɗam>:kaajam
ɗam<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_ka>:ɗaʼam
ɗam<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_ka>:ɗaam
ɗam<prn><p3><sg><dem><dst><cl_ka>:ɗama
ka<prn><p3><sg><cl_ka>:ka
ka<prn><pos><p3><sg><cl_ka>:maaka
ka<prn><p3><sg><emph><cl_ka>:kanka
ka<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_ka>:kaʼa
ka<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_ka>:kaa
ka<prn><p3><sg><dem><dst><cl_ka>:kaya
ki<prn><p3><sg><cl_ki>:ki
ki<prn><pos><p3><sg><cl_ki>:maaki
ki<prn><p3><sg><emph><cl_ki>:kanki
ki<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_ki>:kiʼi
ki<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_ki>:kii
ki<prn><p3><sg><dem><dst><cl_ki>:kiya
ko<prn><p3><sg><cl_ko>:ko
ko<prn><pos><p3><sg><cl_ko>:maako
ko<prn><p3><sg><emph><cl_ko>:kanko
ko<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_ko>:koʼo
ko<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_ko>:koo
ko<prn><p3><sg><dem><dst><cl_ko>:koya
nde<prn><p3><sg><cl_nde>:nde
nde<prn><pos><p3><sg><cl_nde>:maare
nde<prn><p3><sg><emph><cl_nde>:kayre
nde<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_nde>:ndeʼe
nde<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_nde>:ndee
nde<prn><p3><sg><dem><dst><cl_nde>:ndeya
ndi<prn><p3><sg><cl_ndi>:ndi
ndi<prn><pos><p3><sg><cl_ndi>:maari
ndi<prn><p3><sg><emph><cl_ndi>:kayri
ndi<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_ndi>:ndiʼi
ndi<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_ndi>:ndii
ndi<prn><p3><sg><dem><dst><cl_ndi>:ndiya
ndu<prn><p3><sg><cl_ndu>:ndu
ndu<prn><pos><p3><sg><cl_ndu>:maaru
ndu<prn><p3><sg><emph><cl_ndu>:kayru
ndu<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_ndu>:nduʼu
ndu<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_ndu>:nduu
ndu<prn><p3><sg><dem><dst><cl_ndu>:nduya
nga<prn><p3><sg><cl_nga>:nga
nga<prn><pos><p3><sg><cl_nga>:maanga
nga<prn><p3><sg><emph><cl_nga>:kanga
nga<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_nga>:ngaʼa
nga<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_nga>:ngaa
nga<prn><p3><sg><dem><dst><cl_nga>:ngaya
ngal<prn><p3><sg><cl_ngal>:ngal
ngal<prn><pos><p3><sg><cl_ngal>:maangal
ngal<prn><p3><sg><emph><cl_ngal>:kangal
ngal<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_ngal>:ngaʼal
ngal<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_ngal>:ngaal
ngal<prn><p3><sg><dem><dst><cl_ngal>:ngaya
nge<prn><p3><sg><cl_nge>:nge
nge<prn><pos><p3><sg><cl_nge>:maange
nge<prn><p3><sg><emph><cl_nge>:kange
nge<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_ngal>:ngeʼe
nge<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_ngal>:ngee
nge<prn><p3><sg><dem><dst><cl_ngal>:ngeya
ngel<prn><p3><sg><cl_ngel>:ngel
ngel<prn><pos><p3><sg><cl_ngel>:maangel
ngel<prn><p3><sg><emph><cl_ngel>:kangel
ngel<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_ngel>:ngeʼel
ngel<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_ngel>:ngeel
ngel<prn><p3><sg><dem><dst><cl_ngel>:ngeya
ngo<prn><p3><sg><cl_ngo>:ngo
ngo<prn><pos><p3><sg><cl_ngo>:maango
ngo<prn><p3><sg><emph><cl_ngo>:kango
ngo<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_ngo>:ngoʼo
ngo<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_ngo>:ngoo
ngo<prn><p3><sg><dem><dst><cl_ngo>:ngoya
ngol<prn><p3><sg><cl_ngol>:ngol
ngol<prn><pos><p3><sg><cl_ngol>:maangol
ngol<prn><p3><sg><emph><cl_ngol>:kangol
ngol<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_ngol>:ngoʼol
ngol<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_ngol>:ngool
ngol<prn><p3><sg><dem><dst><cl_ngol>:ngoya
ngu<prn><p3><sg>><cl_ngu>:ngu
ngu<prn><pos><p3><sg><cl_ngu>:maangu
ngu<prn><p3><sg><emph><cl_ngu>:kangu
ngu<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_ngu>:nguʼu
ngu<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_ngu>:nguu
ngu<prn><p3><sg><dem><dst><cl_ngu>:nguya
o<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_o>:oʼo
o<prn><p3><sg><dem><prx><cl_o>:oo
o<prn><p3><sg><dem><dst><cl_o>:oya
ɓe<prn><p3><pl><dem><prx><cl_ɓe>:ɓeʼe
ɓe<prn><p3><pl><dem><prx><cl_ɓe>:ɓee
ɓe<prn><p3><pl><dem><dst><cl_ɓe>:ɓeya
ɗe<prn><p3><pl>:ɗe
ɗe<prn><pos><p3><pl>:maaje
ɗe<prn><p3><pl><emph>:kanje
ɗe<prn><p3><pl><dem><prx><cl_ɗe>:ɗeʼe
ɗe<prn><p3><pl><dem><prx><cl_ɗe>:ɗee
ɗe<prn><p3><pl><dem><dst><cl_ɗe>:ɗeya
ɗi<prn><p3><pl>:ɗi
ɗi<prn><pos><p3><pl>:maaji
ɗi<prn><p3><pl><emph>:kanji
ɗi<prn><p3><pl><dem><prx><cl_ɗi>:ɗiʼi
ɗi<prn><p3><pl><dem><prx><cl_ɗi>:ɗii
ɗi<prn><p3><pl><dem><dst><cl_ɗi>:ɗiya
koy<prn><p3><pl>:koy
koy<prn><pos><p3><pl>:maakoy
koy<prn><p3><pl><emph>:kankoy
koy<prn><p3><pl><dem><prx><cl_koy>:koʼoy
koy<prn><p3><pl><dem><prx><cl_koy>:kooy
koy<prn><p3><pl><dem><dst><cl_koy>:koya
ɗume<prn><itg>:ɗume
ko<prn><itg>:ko
moy<prn><itg>:moy
ndey<prn><itg>:ndey
now<prn><itg>:noy
toy<prn><itg>:toy
ɗam<prn><itg><cl_ɗam>:ɗame
ka<prn><itg><cl_ka>:kaye
ki<prn><itg><cl_ki>:kiye
ko<prn><itg><cl_ko>:koye
nde<prn><itg><cl_nde>:ndeye
ndi<prn><itg><cl_ndi>:ndiye
ndu<prn><itg><cl_ndu>:nduye
nga<prn><itg><cl_nga>:ngaye
ngal<prn><itg><cl_ngal>:ngale
nge<prn><itg><cl_nge>:ngeye
ngel<prn><itg><cl_ngel>:ngele
ngo<prn><itg><cl_ngo>:ngoye
ngol<prn><itg><cl_ngol>:ngole
ngu<prn><itg><cl_ngu>:nguye
o<prn><itg><cl_o>:moye
ɓe<prn><itg><cl_ɓe>:ɓeye
ɗe<prn><itg><cl_ɗe>:ɗeye
ɗi<prn><itg><cl_ɗi>:ɗiye
koy<prn><itg><cl_koy>:koye
man<prn>:man

LEXICON Adjective
feere<adj>:feere
peetel<adj>:peetel
famɗugo<adj><cl_nde>:famarde
mawnugo<adj><cl_nde>:mawnde
famɗugo<adj><cl_ngal>:pamaral 
mawnugo<adj><cl_nde>:manngal 
ɗuudugo<adj><cl_ngal>:ɗuungal
famɗugo<adj><cl_nge>:famare 
mawnugo<adj><cl_nge>:mannge
famɗugo<adj><cl_ngu>:pamaru 
mawnugo<adj><cl_ngu>:manngu
famɗugo<adj><cl_ndu>:famardu 
mawnugo<adj><cl_ndu>:mawndu
famɗugo<adj><cl_ko>:pamaro 
mawnugo<adj><cl_ko>:makko 
ɗuudugo<adj><cl_ko>:duuɗko
ɗuuɗudo<adj><cl_ɗam>:ɗuuɗam
famɗugo<adj><cl_ka>:pamara 
mawnugo<adj><cl_ka>:makka 
ɗuudugo<adj><cl_ka>:ɗuuɗka
famɗugo<adj><cl_nga>:pamara 
mawnugo<adj><cl_nga>:mannga
famɗugo<adj><cl_ngo>:famaro 
mawnugo<adj><cl_ngo>:manngo 
famɗugo<adj><cl_ngol>:pamerol 
mawnugo<adj><cl_ngol>:manngol 
ɗuudugo<adj><cl_ngol>:ɗuungol
famɗugo<adj><cl_ndi>:pamardi 
mawnugo<adj><cl_ndi>:mawndi 
ɗuudugo<adj><cl_ndi>:ɗuundi
famɗugo<adj><cl_ki>:pameri
mawnugo<adj><cl_ki>:makki
famɗugo<adj><cl_ngel>:pamarel
mawnugo<adj><cl_ngel>:manngel
famɗugo<adj><cl_koy>:pamaroy 
mawnugo<adj><cl_koy>:makkoy
ɗuudugo<adj><cl_koy>:ɗuuɗkoy
famɗugo<adj><cl_ɗe>:pamarɗe
mawnugo<adj><cl_ɗe>:mawɗe
ɗuudugo<adj><cl_ɗe>:ɗuuɗɗe
famɗugo<adj><cl_ɗi>:pamarɗi
mawnugo<adj><cl_ɗi>:mawɗi
ɗuudugo<adj><cl_ɗi>:ɗuuɗɗi
famɗugo<adj><cl_o>:pamaro
mawnugo<adj><cl_o>:mawɗo
famɗugo<adj><cl_ɓe>:famarɓe
mawnugo<adj><cl_ɓe>:mawɓe
ɗuudugo<adj><cl_ɓe>:ɗuuɗɓe
